Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201879-2,152
State Department of Education; powers.

In addition to the development of a model policy, the State Department of Education may offer training for teachers, counselors, and administrators on each school district's policy adopted under section 79-2,150 and the rights of pregnant and parenting students to receive equal access to education.

Laws 2017, LB427, § 4.